Hawaii statutes.
§674-7 Review by panel required. Any
individual beneficiary under the trust claiming actual damages arising out of
or resulting from a breach of trust, which occurred between August 21, 1959,
and June 30, 1988, and which was caused by an act or omission of an employee of
the State in the management and disposition of trust resources under the trust,
shall file a claim therefor for review by the panel no later than August 31,
1995, or shall forever be barred. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 351, §5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next